Washington statutes.
RCW 41.60.150

Recognition awards.

Other than suggestion awards and incentive pay unit awards, agencies shall have the authority to recognize employees, either individually or as a class, for accomplishments including outstanding achievements, safety performance, longevity, outstanding public service, or service as employee suggestion evaluators and implementors. Recognition awards may not exceed two hundred dollars in value per award. Such awards may include, but not be limited to, cash or such items as pen and desk sets, plaques, pins, framed certificates, clocks, and calculators. Award costs shall be paid by the agency giving the award.

[ 2023 c 106 s 6; 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 9; 2010 c 1 s 6; 2000 c 139 s 2; 1999 c 50 s 10; 1989 c 56 s 5; 1985 c 114 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 39: See note following RCW 41.04.820.

Effective date—2010 c 1: See note following RCW 41.06.070.

Effective date—1989 c 56: See note following RCW 41.60.041.

Effective date—1985 c 114: See note following RCW 41.60.015.